hu: Hatótávolság típusa: Nagy hatótávolságú; Rövid hatótávolságú; Egyéb
en: Range type: Long-range; Short-range; Other
el: Τύπος εύρους: Μεγάλη εμβέλεια; Μικρή εμβέλεια; Άλλο
pl: Typ zasięgu: Daleki zasięg; Krótki zasięg; Inne
sl-SI: Vrsta obsega: Dolg doseg; Kratki doseg; Drugo
nb: Ovnstype: Lang rekkevidde; Kort rekkevidde; Annet
ko: 레인지 유형: 장거리; 단거리; 기타
zh-CN: 量程类型: 远程; 短程; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de alcance: Longo alcance; Curto alcance; Outro
zh-TW: 範圍類型: 長距; 短距; 其他
ro-RO: Tip arie de acoperire: Cu rază mare de acțiune; Cu rază scurtă de acțiune; Altele
nl: Type bereik: Lange afstand; Korte afstand; Andere
fi: Vaihteluvälityyppi: Pitkän kantaman; Lyhyen kantaman; Muu
th: ประเภทช่วง: ระยะยาว; ระยะสั้น; อื่นๆ
de: Reichweitentyp: Lange Reichweite; Kurze Reichweite; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de rango: Largo alcance; Corto alcance; Otros
lt-LT: Veikimo diapazono tipas: Ilgasis nuotolis; Trumpasis nuotolis; Kita
da: Rækkeviddetype: Lang rækkevidde; Kort rækkevidde; Andet
ja: 通信距離の種類: 長距離; 短距離; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de alcance: Longo alcance; Curto alcance; Outro
bg-BG: Тип диапазон: Дълъг диапазон; Къс диапазон; Други
sv: Räckviddstyp: Lång räckvidd; Kort räckvidd; Övrigt
ru: Тип диапазона: Дальний диапазон; Ближний диапазон; Другой
tr: Aralık türü: Uzun menzil; Kısa menzil; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ rozsahu: Diaľkový dojazd; Krátky dojazd; Iné
vi: Loại phạm vi: Tầm xa; Tầm gần; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta dosega: Dugog dometa; Kratkog dometa; Ostalo
it: Tipo di portata: Lunga portata; Breve portata; Altro
cs: Typ dosahu: Dlouhý dosah; Krátký dosah; Jiné
fr: Type de gamme: Longue portée; Courte portée; Autre